Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 64 Electronic Imaging Devices

11-64-1.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter the following definitions apply:

“Disseminate” means to make available by any means to any person.

“Harm” means bodily injury, emotional distress, financial loss, or reputational injury.

“Identifiable” means identifiable by any person from the visual image or information offered in connection with the visual material.

“Imaging device” means any electronic instrument capable of capturing, recording, storing, or transmitting visual images.

“Intimate areas” means the naked or undergarment clad genitals, pubic area, buttocks, or any portion of the female breast below the top of the areola of a person that the person intended to be protected from public view.

“Legal entity” means any partnership, firm, association, corporation, or any agent or servant thereof.

“Publish” means to:

Disseminate with the intent that the image or images be made available by any means to any person or other legal entity;

Disseminate with the intent the images be sold by another person or legal entity;

Post, present, display, exhibit, circulate, advertise, or allow access by any means, so as to make an image or images available to the public; or

Disseminate with the intent that an image or images be posted, presented, displayed, exhibited, circulated, advertised, or made accessible by any means, and to make the images available to the public.

“Sell” means to disseminate to another person, or to publish, in exchange for something of value.

“Sexually explicit conduct” means actual:

Graphic sexual intercourse, including: genital-genital, oral-genital, anal-genital, or oral-anal, or lascivious sex where the genitals or pubic area of any person is exhibited;

Bestiality;

Masturbation; or

Sadistic or masochistic abuse.

“Visual image” means any photograph, film, video, or digital image or recording, whether produced by electronic, mechanical, or other means.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 202, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 206, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 27, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 28, § 1.

11-64-2.
Video voyeurism.

A person is guilty of video voyeurism when, for the purpose of sexual arousal, gratification or stimulation, such person:

Uses, installs or permits the use or installation of an imaging device to capture, record, store or transmit visual images of the intimate areas of another person without that other person’s knowledge and consent, and under circumstances in which that other person would have a reasonable expectation of privacy.

Intentionally, and with knowledge that the image was obtained in violation of subsection (a), disseminates, publishes, or sells such image of the captured representation of another person or persons depicted in the representation or reproduction, and who did not consent to the dissemination, publication or sale.

A person is also guilty of video voyeurism when that person, for the purpose of sexual arousal, gratification or stimulation, looks into an occupied dwelling or other building by use of an imaging device that provides images of the interior of a dwelling.

A person found guilty of the crime of video voyeurism shall be imprisoned for not more than three (3) years in jail and/or fined not more than five thousand dollars ($5000).

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 202, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 206, § 2.

11-64-3.
Unauthorized dissemination of indecent material.

A person is guilty of unauthorized dissemination of a sexually explicit visual image of another person when the person intentionally, by any means, disseminates, publishes, or sells:

A visual image that depicts another identifiable person eighteen (18) years or older engaged in sexually explicit conduct or of the intimate areas of that person;

The visual image was made, captured, recorded, or obtained under circumstances in which a reasonable person would know or understand that the image was to remain private;

The visual image was disseminated, published, or sold without the consent of the depicted person; and

With knowledge or with reckless disregard for the likelihood that the depicted person will suffer harm, or with the intent to harass, intimidate, threaten, or coerce the depicted person.

Subsection (a) shall not apply to:

A visual image that involves voluntary exposure of intimate areas or of sexually explicit conduct in a public or commercial setting, or in a place where a person does not have a reasonable expectation of privacy;

Dissemination made in the public interest, scientific activities, or educational activities;

Dissemination made in the course of a lawful public proceeding;

Dissemination made for purposes of law enforcement, criminal reporting, corrections, legal proceedings, the reporting of unlawful conduct, or for medical treatment; or

Dissemination of an image that constitutes a matter of public concern, such as a matter related to a newsworthy event or related to a public figure.

For the purposes of this section, “intimate areas” means the naked genitals, pubic area, buttocks, or any portion of the female breast below the top of the areola of a person that the person intended to protect from public view.

A first violation of this section shall be a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, subject to imprisonment of not more than one year, a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both. A second or subsequent violation of this section shall be a felony and, upon conviction, subject to imprisonment for not more than three (3) years, a fine of not more than three thousand dollars ($3,000), or both.

Any person who intentionally threatens to disclose any visual image described in subsection (a) and makes the threat to obtain a benefit in return for not making the disclosure or in connection with the threatened disclosure, shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, be subject to imprisonment for up to five (5) years, a fine of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.

Any person who demands payment of money, property, services, or anything else of value from a person in exchange for removing any visual image described in subsection (a) from public view shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, be subject to imprisonment for up to five (5) years, a fine of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.

Those in violation of this section shall not be subject to sex offender registration requirements as set forth in chapter 37.1 of title 11 entitled “Sexual Offender Registration and Community Notification Act.”

A violation of this section is committed within this state if any conduct that is an element of the offense, or any harm to the depicted person resulting from the offense, occurs in this state.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to impose liability on an interactive computer service, as defined in 47 U.S.C. § 230(f)(2), an information service, as defined in 47 U.S.C. § 153, or a telecommunications service, as defined in §

44-18-7.1

, for content provided by another person.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 27, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 28, § 2.